en: Wines from Greece, Greek wines
de: Weine aus Griechenland
fr: Vins grecs, vin grec, vins de Grèce, vin de Grèce
hr: Vina iz grčke
hu: Görög borok
nl: Griekse wijnen, Griekse wijn, Wijn uit Griekenland

en: Amynteo
el: Amynteo, Αμύνταιο
zh: 阿明泰奥葡萄酒

en: Anavyssos
el: Anavyssos, Ανάβυσσος
zh: 阿纳维索斯葡萄酒

en: Anchialos
el: Anchialos, Αγχίαλος
zh: 安基亚洛斯葡萄酒

en: Archanes
el: Αρχάνες, Archanes

en: Argolida
el: Αργολίδα, Argolida

el: Πεζά, Peza
en: Peza

el: Πιερία, Pieria
en: Pieria

el: Πισάτιδα, Pisatis
en: Pisatis

el: Πυλία, Pylia
en: Pylia

el: Ραψάνη, Rapsani
en: Rapsani

en: Retsaina of Megara, Retsaina of Megara Attika
el: Ρετσίνα Μεγάρων, Ρετσίνα Μεγάρων Αττική, Retsaina of Megara, Retsaina of Megara Attika

en: Retsina of Ewia
el: Ρετσίνα Ευβοίας, Retsina of Ewia

en: Retsina of Gialtra, Retsina of Gialtra Ewia
el: Ρετσίνα Γιάλτρων Εύβοια, Ρετσίνα Γιάλτρων, Retsina of Gialtra, Retsina of Gialtra Ewia

en: Retsina of Halkida, Retsina of Halkida Ewia
el: Ρετσίνα Χαλκίδας, Ρετσίνα Χαλκίδας Εύβοια, Retsina of Halkida, Retsina of Halkida Ewia

en: Retsina of Karystos, Retsina of Karystos Ewia
el: Ρετσίνα Καρύστου, Ρετσίνα Καρύστου Εύβοια, Retsina of Karystos, Retsina of Karystos Ewia

en: Retsina of Kropia, Retsina of Koropi, Retsina of Koropi Attika
el: Retsina of Kropia, Retsina of Koropi, Retsina of Koropi Attika, Ρετσίνα Κρωπίας, Ρετσίνα Κορωπίου, Ρετσίνα Κορωπίου Αττική

en: Retsina of Markopoulo, Retsina of Markopoulo Attika
el: Retsina of Markopoulo, Retsina of Markopoulo Attika, Ρετσίνα Μαρκοπούλου, Ρετσίνα Μαρκοπούλου Αττική

en: Retsina of Mesogia, Retsina of Mesogia Attika
el: Retsina of Mesogia, Retsina of Mesogia Attika, Ρετσίνα Μεσογείων, Ρετσίνα Μεσογείων Αττική

en: Retsina of Pallini, Retsina of Pallini Attika
el: Retsina of Pallini, Retsina of Pallini Attika, Ρετσίνα Παλλήνης, Ρετσίνα Παλλήνης Αττική